Utah statutes.
48-2e-301.   Becoming limited partners.

(1)  Upon formation of a limited partnership, a person becomes a limited partner as agreed among the persons that are to be the initial partners.

(2)  After formation, a person becomes a limited partner:

(a)  as provided in the partnership agreement;

(b)  as the result of a transaction effective under Part 11, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication;

(c)  with the affirmative vote or consent of all the partners; or

(d)  as provided in Subsection 48-2e-801(1)(d) or (1)(e).

(3)  A person may become a partner without:

(a)  acquiring a transferable interest; or

(b)  making or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

